Hawaii statutes.
§367-2.5 Executive director. The
commission shall appoint an executive director for the proper administration
and enforcement of this chapter without regard to chapter 76. [L 1984, c 74,
§1; am L 1995, c 151, §4; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next